Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 5

Supervision by Commissioner

45-5-501. Supervision by commissioner — Powers of commissioner.

Each registrant shall be subject to the supervision of the commissioner.

The commissioner is authorized to make and enforce reasonable rules and regulations necessary and proper for the administration, enforcement and interpretation of this chapter.

In adopting the rules and regulations, the commissioner shall follow the procedures set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. A copy of every rule and regulation shall be mailed to each registrant at least thirty (30) days prior to the date it shall take effect.

The commissioner, for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter and for the purpose of determining whether persons are subject to this chapter, is authorized to examine the registrants, including all books, records and papers employed by the registrants in the transaction of their business, and to summon witnesses and examine them under oath, concerning matters relating to the business of the persons or other matters that may be relevant in the discovery of violations of this chapter. The commissioner may employ deputies and assistants who may be necessary for this purpose, and the deputies and assistants shall be vested with the same authority conferred upon the commissioner by this subsection (d).

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 16; T.C.A., § 45-2016; Acts 1983, ch. 274, § 19; 1985, ch. 107, § 5; 2004, ch. 747, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-5-502. Examination or investigation fees.

The costs for an examination or investigation of registrants shall be assessed pursuant to §45-1-118(i). An unregistered person subject to the certificate of registration requirements of this chapter, that is examined or investigated in accordance with this chapter, shall pay to the commissioner the reasonable and actual expenses of the investigation or examination.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 17; T.C.A., § 45-2017; Acts 1981, ch. 416, § 3; 1984, ch. 698, § 1; 1986, ch. 576, § 4; 2004, ch. 747, § 13; 2014, ch. 736, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-503. Annual reports of registrants — Reports by commissioner to governor and general assembly.

Each registrant shall file an annual report with the commissioner by July 31 of each year, containing the following information:

The names and addresses of persons owning controlling interest in the registrant;

The location of all places of business operated by the registrant and the nature of the business conducted at each location;

The names and addresses of all affiliated lenders and affiliated insurance companies doing business in this state;

Balance sheets, statements of income and expense, summaries of the types of loans made, and other statistical information that may reasonably be required by the commissioner, consistent with generally accepted accounting practices, for the purpose of determining the general results of operations under this chapter; and

If the registrant is a corporation, the names and addresses of its officers and directors, or if the registrant is a partnership, the names and addresses of the partners.

If the registrant holds two (2) or more certificates of registration or is affiliated with other registrants, a composite report may be filed, but may not be required.

The reports shall be filed in a form that may reasonably be required by the commissioner and shall be sworn to by a responsible officer of the registrant. The commissioner is encouraged to adopt forms for the reports consistent with any system uniform with other states.

The commissioner shall prepare and submit to the governor and the general assembly, annually, an analysis and recapitulation of the reports for the preceding calendar year for the purpose of reflecting the general results of operations under this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 18; T.C.A., § 45-2018.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

45-5-504. Violations — Cease and Desist Orders — Penalties.

If, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner finds that a person has violated this chapter, or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter, the commissioner may take any or all of the following actions:

Order the person to cease and desist violating this chapter or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter;

Require the refund of any interest, fees, or charges collected by the person in violation of this chapter or any administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter; and

Order the person to pay the commissioner a civil monetary penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation of this chapter or administrative rule issued pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 204, § 20; T.C.A., § 45-2020; Acts 2004, ch. 747, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-5-101.

45-5-505. Change of control.

A change in control of a registrant shall require thirty (30) days prior notice in writing to the commissioner. However, in the case of a publicly traded corporation, notification shall be made in writing within thirty (30) days of a change or acquisition of control of a registrant.

Upon notification, the commissioner may require information deemed necessary to determine whether an application for registration is required. The commissioner may waive the filing of an application if, in the commissioner's discretion, the change in control does not pose any risk to the interests of the public.

Whenever control of a registrant is acquired or exercised in violation of this section, the registration of the registrant shall be deemed revoked as of the date of the unlawful acquisition of control. The registrant, or its controlling person, shall surrender the registration to the commissioner on demand.

Acts 2001, ch. 165, § 9.

45-5-506. Bar from industry.

If the crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with this chapter, the commissioner, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may censure, suspend for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months, or bar a person from any position of management, control, employment or providing services for any registrant or other person subject to the commissioner's jurisdiction, if the commissioner finds that the:

Censure, suspension or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this chapter, a rule or regulation, or an order of the commissioner; or

Person has been:

Convicted of or pled guilty to or nolo contendere to any crime; or

Held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency.

Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a registrant and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a registrant is conducting its business. This subsection (b) shall not be construed to prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal transactions processed by a registrant.

This section shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea, or judgment after July 1, 2001.

Acts 2001, ch. 165, § 9; 2004, ch. 747, § 15.

45-5-507. Filing of written report with commissioner — Events impacting activities of registrant.

Within fifteen (15) days of the occurrence of any one (1) of the events listed in this section, a registrant shall file a written report with the commissioner describing the event and its expected impact on the activities of the registrant:

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the registrant;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the registrant by any state or governmental authority;

The denial of the opportunity to engage in business by any state or governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the registrant or any of its officers, directors or principals, or partners;

Any felony conviction of the registrant or any of its officers, directors, principals, or partners; and

Other events that the commissioner may determine and identify by rule.

Acts 2001, ch. 165, § 9.

45-5-508. Preservation of records — Reproduction.

All books and records required to be preserved by any regulation of the commissioner or required by any federal statute, regulation, or regulatory guideline, as applicable to each registrant, shall be preserved and made available to the commissioner, as provided in this chapter, for a period of twenty-five (25) months on all rejected applications and for a period of twenty-four (24) months on loans paid in full. The registrant may cause any or all records at any time in its custody to be reproduced or preserved, or both, by itself or by any other person who agrees in writing to submit its operations to the examination of the commissioner to the extent that the operations directly affect recordkeeping by any microphotographic process, electronic or mechanical data storage technique or any other means. A record reproduced or preserved, or both, by those processes, techniques or means shall have the same force and effect as the original record and be admitted into evidence equally with the original.

Acts 2001, ch. 165, § 9.

45-5-509. Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into consent orders at any time with any person to resolve any matter arising under this chapter. A consent order shall be signed by the person to whom it is issued, or a duly authorized representative, and shall indicate agreement to the terms contained in the consent order. A consent order need not constitute an admission by any person that any provision of this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter has been violated, nor need it constitute a finding by the commissioner that the person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation or order promulgated or issued under this chapter.

Notwithstanding the issuance of a consent order, the commissioner may seek civil or criminal penalties or compromise civil penalties concerning matters encompassed by the consent order.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take any enforcement action authorized by this chapter without providing the opportunity for a prior hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken that is filed with the commissioner within twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice to the commissioner's emergency action.

Acts 2004, ch. 747, § 16.